Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2448
Stock or other property; market value; how determined.

The market value of stock or property other than cash or stock shall be determined as follows:

(1) In the case of stock, by:

(a) The highest closing sale price during the thirty days immediately before the date in question of a share of the same class or series of stock on the composite tape for stocks listed on the New York Stock Exchange or, if the same class or series of stock is not quoted on the composite tape or if the same class or series of stock is not listed on the New York Stock Exchange, on the principal United States securities exchange registered under the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934 on which the same class or series of stock is listed;

(b) If the same class or series of stock is not listed on an exchange described in subdivision (1)(a) of this section, the highest closing bid quotation for a share of the same class or series of stock during the thirty days immediately before the date in question on the National Association of Securities Dealers Automated Quotation System or any similar system then in use; or

(c) If no quotations described in subdivision (1)(b) of this section are available, the fair market value on the date in question of a share of the same class or series of stock as determined in good faith by the board of directors of the issuing public corporation; and

(2) In the case of property other than cash or stock, the fair market value of the property on the date in question as determined in good faith by the board of directors of the issuing public corporation.

Laws 1988, LB 1110, § 18.